Utah statutes.
17D-1-205.   Notice.
(1)  Each notice required under Subsection 17D-1-204(1) shall:
(a)  state that:
(i)  the legislative body has adopted a resolution stating its intent to
create a special service district; or
(ii)  a petition has been filed proposing the creation of a special service
district;
(b)  describe the boundary of the proposed special service district;
(c)  generally describe each service that the special service district is
proposed to provide;
(d)  state that taxes may be levied annually upon all taxable property within
the proposed special service district;
(e)  state that fees or charges may be imposed to pay for some or all of the
services that the special service district is proposed to provide;
(f)  explain the process, requirements, and timetable for filing a protest
against the creation of the special service district or against a service that
the special service district is proposed to provide;
(g)  designate a date, time, and place for a public hearing on the proposed
creation of the special service district; and
(h)  except as provided in Subsection (2), be published:
(i) (A)  at least once a week during three consecutive weeks;
(B)  not less than 21 days or more than 35 days before the date of the public
hearing required under Subsection 17D-1-204(2); and
(C)  in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality by
which the special service district is proposed to be created; and
(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for 35 days before the date of the
public hearing required under Subsection 17D-1-204(2).
(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(h)(i), if the proposed special service
district is located entirely within a city of the third, fourth, or fifth
class or a town that has no newspaper of general circulation in the city or
town, the legislative body of the city or town may provide that the notice
required under Subsection 17D-1-204(1) be given by posting the notice in at
least five public places in the city or town at least 21 days before the
public hearing required under Subsection 17D-1-204(2).
(3)  The legislative body of the county or municipality by which the special
service district is proposed to be created may include in a notice under this
section any other information that the legislative body considers necessary or
appropriate.
